Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.210

Modification of confirmed award or judgment.

If a party requests under law of this state other than this chapter a modification of an award confirmed under RCW 26.14.150 or judgment on the award based on a fact occurring after confirmation:

(1) The parties shall proceed under the dispute resolution method specified in the award or judgment; or

(2) If the award or judgment does not specify a dispute resolution method, the parties may:

(a) Agree to arbitrate the modification before the original arbitrator or another arbitrator; or

(b) Absent agreement, proceed under law of this state other than this chapter governing modification of a judgment in a family law proceeding.

[ 2023 c 61 s 22.]